Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-243
Application for water; reservoir intended for raising water level.

A reservoir constructed for the purpose of holding water back and raising it in order that it may be applied to lands of a higher level or given a greater head for power, shall not be considered a storage reservoir, but such reservoir together with the diverting or impounding dam, must be described in an application for flowing water when water is to be raised, in order to perfect the appropriation.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 17, p. 853;

C.S.1922, § 8467;

C.S.1929, § 46-617;

R.S.1943, § 46-243.